Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-708
Certified registered nurse anesthetist; temporary license; permit.

(1) The department may, with the approval of the board, grant a temporary license in the practice of anesthesia for up to one hundred twenty days upon application (a) to graduates of an accredited school of nurse anesthesia pending results of the first certifying examination following graduation and (b) to registered nurse anesthetists currently licensed in another state pending completion of the application for a Nebraska license. A temporary license issued pursuant to this subsection may be extended at the discretion of the board with the approval of the department.

(2) An applicant for a license to practice as a certified registered nurse anesthetist who is a military spouse may apply for a temporary license as provided in section 38-129.01.

Laws 1981, LB 379, § 28;

Laws 1984, LB 724, § 30;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 75;

Laws 1996, LB 414, § 45;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 156;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 79;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1731;

Laws 2007, LB185, § 16;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 238;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 41.